Connecticut, session 2026, SB00151.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. Subsection (d) of section 8-2 of the 2026 supplement to the
general statutes, as amended by section 18 of public act 25-1 of the
November special session, is repealed and the following is substituted
in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
(d) Zoning regulations adopted pursuant to subsection (a) of this
section shall not:
(1) (A) Prohibit the operation in a residential zone of any family child
care home or group child care home located in a residence, or (B) require
any special zoning permit or special zoning exception for such
operation;
(2) (A) Prohibit the use of receptacles for the storage of items
designated for recycling in accordance with section 22a-241b or require
that such receptacles comply with provisions for bulk or lot area, or
similar provisions, except provisions for side yards, rear yards and front
yards; or (B) unreasonably restrict access to or the size of such
sSB151 / File No. 171 1

sSB151 File No. 171
receptacles for businesses, given the nature of the business and the
volume of items designated for recycling in accordance with section 22a-
241b, that such business produces in its normal course of business,
provided nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit such
regulations from requiring the screening or buffering of such receptacles
for aesthetic reasons;
(3) Impose conditions and requirements on manufactured homes,
including mobile manufactured homes built in accordance with federal
manufactured home construction and safety standards or on lots
containing such manufactured homes, including mobile manufactured
home parks, if those conditions and requirements are substantially
different from conditions and requirements imposed on (A) single-
family dwellings; (B) lots containing single-family dwellings; or (C)
multifamily dwellings, lots containing multifamily dwellings, cluster
developments or planned unit developments;
(4) (A) Prohibit the continuance of any nonconforming use, building
or structure existing at the time of the adoption of such regulations; (B)
require a special permit or special exception for any such continuance;
(C) provide for the termination of any nonconforming use solely as a
result of nonuse for a specified period of time without regard to the
intent of the property owner to maintain that use; or (D) terminate or
deem abandoned a nonconforming use, building or structure unless the
property owner of such use, building or structure voluntarily
discontinues such use, building or structure and such discontinuance is
accompanied by an intent to not reestablish such use, building or
structure. The demolition or deconstruction of a nonconforming use,
building or structure shall not by itself be evidence of such property
owner's intent to not reestablish such use, building or structure;
(5) Prohibit the installation, in accordance with the provisions of
section 8-1bb, of temporary health care structures for use by mentally or
physically impaired persons if such structures comply with the
provisions of said section, unless the municipality opts out in
accordance with the provisions of subsection (j) of said section;
sSB151 / File No. 171 2

sSB151 File No. 171
(6) Prohibit the operation in a residential zone of any cottage food
operation, as defined in section 21a-62b;
(7) Establish for any dwelling unit a minimum floor area that is
greater than the minimum floor area set forth in the applicable building,
housing or other code;
(8) Place a fixed numerical or percentage cap on the number of
dwelling units that constitute multifamily housing over four units,
middle housing or mixed-use development that may be permitted in the
municipality;
(9) Require a minimum number of off-street motor vehicle parking
spaces for any residential development except as provided in section 8-
3n; [or]
(10) Be applied to deny any land use application, including for any
site plan approval, special permit, special exception or other zoning
approval, on the basis of (A) a district's character, unless such character
is expressly articulated in such regulations by clear and explicit physical
standards for site work and structures, or (B) the immutable
characteristics, source of income or income level of any applicant or end
user, other than age or disability whenever age-restricted or disability-
restricted housing may be permitted; or
(11) (A) Establish (i) a minimum lot size of greater than five thousand
square feet for lots on which a single-family dwelling or townhouse may
be located in areas connected or planned to be connected to public water
and sewer systems; (ii) minimum square footage or exterior dimension
requirements for a single-family dwelling or townhouse; (iii) lot
coverage maximums for a single-family dwelling and any accessory
structures or a townhouse and any accessory structures, except as
provided in subdivision (4) of subsection (a) of section 8-2o; (iv)
minimum building setbacks for a single-family dwelling and accessory
structures of greater than: (I) Ten feet for front and rear setbacks, and
(II) five feet for side setbacks; and (v) design, architectural or aesthetic
elements for a single-family dwelling;
sSB151 / File No. 171 3

sSB151 File No. 171
(B) Prohibit the placement of townhouses in a single-family
residential zoning district; or
(C) Prevent the owner of an improved lot in an area zoned for single-
family residential use from subdividing the lot into three or fewer
smaller lots that conform to local law, provided the improved lot was
not created by subdivision within the preceding three years. As used in
this subparagraph, "improved lot" means a parcel on which a residential
structure is located.
The provisions of this subdivision do not apply to: (i) Any property or
district that was listed on the National Register of Historic Places, 16a
USC 470, as amended from time to time, or the state register of historic
places, as defined in section 10-410, on or before July 1, 2026; (ii)
agricultural land for which the development rights have been acquired
by the state pursuant to section 22-26cc; (iii) land subject to a
conservation restriction or preservation restriction, as such terms are
defined in section 47-42a; and (iv) any situation in which the provisions
of this subdivision conflict with applicable building codes, fire codes or
public health and safety regulations that are necessary to address
immediate threats to public safety.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 October 1, 2026 8-2(d)
Statement of Legislative Commissioners:
In Subdiv. (11)(A), "subdivision (4) of section 8-2o" was changed to
"subdivision (4) of subsection (a) of section 8-2o" for accuracy and
references to "single-family home" were changed to "single-family
dwelling" for consistency and in the last paragraph, "such terms are"
was added for clarity.
HSG Joint Favorable Subst. -LCO
sSB151 / File No. 171 4

sSB151 File No. 171
The following Fiscal Impact Statement and Bill Analysis are prepared for the benefit of the members of
the General Assembly, solely for purposes of information, summarization and explanation and do not
represent the intent of the General Assembly or either chamber thereof for any purpose. In general,
fiscal impacts are based upon a variety of informational sources, including the analyst’s professional
knowledge. Whenever applicable, agency data is consulted as part of the analysis, however final
products do not necessarily reflect an assessment from any specific department.
OFA Fiscal Note
State Impact: None
Municipal Impact: See below
Explanation
The bill prohibits municipalities that exercise zoning authority under
the statutes from imposing restrictions on certain types of homes and
lots. This may result in a grand list increase or decrease beginning in FY
that is dependent on how these buildings would have otherwise been
valued.
The Out Years
The annualized ongoing fiscal impact identified above would
continue into the future subject to inflation.
sSB151 / File No. 171 5

sSB151 File No. 171
OLR Bill Analysis
sSB 151
AN ACT PROHIBITING CERTAIN LAND USE AND ZONING
LIMITATIONS ON HOUSING.